District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.03

Prohibition on distracted driving.

Distracted driving shall be prohibited. A person found guilty of distracted driving shall be subject to the fines and penalties set forth in § 50-1731.06(a).

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 3, 51 DCR 1541

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1731.06.